Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “residential treatment facility” has the  meaning
given that term in ORS 443.400.
(2) The Residential Behavioral Health  Capacity Program is established within the Oregon
Health Authority to fund behavioral health programs that are determined  by the authority
to increase residential behavioral health  capacity throughout this state. The authority shall
distribute funding to  behavioral health programs that the authority determines, according
to the guidelines  described in subsection (3) of this section, are likely to have the greatest
immediate impact on communities’ needs for increased withdrawal management facility,
residential treatment facility and psychiatric inpatient facility capacity.
(3) The  authority, after soliciting and considering input from regional partners and
practitioners, shall develop guidelines for distributing funding to  behavioral health programs.
The guidelines shall include, but are not limited to, the following factors:
(a) The impact of  the behavioral health program on the needs identified in a report that
was commissioned by the authority  to study statewide needs for residential behavioral health
capacity;
(b) The ability of the behavioral health program to quickly put the funding to use, in-
cluding the availability of a service provider;
(c) The bed-to-cost ratio of a behavioral health  program’s proposed project, with priority
given to shovel-ready projects;
(d) Geographic equity across this state;
(e) The impact of the behavioral health program on the needs of individuals who have
been committed to the authority under ORS 426.130 or committed to a state hospital under
ORS 161.327 or 161.370; and
(f) Local community input on proposed projects that will serve the highest need.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to  the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $65,000,000,  for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of
section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $106,387
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or  other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco
Enrolled House Bill 2059 (HB 2059-B) Page 1
tax receipts, marijuana tax receipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and  Medicare
receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described  in this section, collected
or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for behavioral health, for  the purpose of car-
rying out the provisions of section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other  law limiting expenditures, the amount of $96,162
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from federal funds, excluding  federal funds described in section 3 of this 2025
Act, collected or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for Medicaid, for the purpose  of
carrying out the provisions of section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $618,396
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from federal funds, excluding federal funds described in  section 3 of this 2025
Act, collected or received by the  Oregon Health Authority, for behavioral health, for the
purpose of carrying out the provisions of section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 6.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 7. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Passed by House June 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 24, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2059 (HB 2059-B) Page 2